District of Columbia statutes.
47-4102

Failure to collect or pay over tax.

(a)

A person required under this title to collect, account for, or pay over tax imposed by this title who willfully fails to collect or truthfully account for and pay over the tax shall, in addition to other penalties provided by law, be guilty of a felony if the amount to be collected or accounted for and paid over exceeds $10,000, and, upon conviction thereof, shall be fined not more than the amount set forth in [§ 22-3571.01] or twice the amount of the tax evaded or attempted to be evaded, whichever is greater, or imprisoned not more than 10 years, or both, together with the costs of prosecution.

(b)

A person required under this title to collect or account for and pay over a tax imposed by this title who fails to collect or truthfully account for and pay over the tax shall, in addition to other penalties provided by law, be guilty of a misdemeanor if the amount to be collected or accounted for and paid over is $10,000 or less, and, upon conviction thereof, shall be fined not more than the amount set forth in [§ 22-3571.01], or imprisoned not more than 180 days, or both, together with costs of prosecution. All prosecutions under this subsection shall be brought in the Superior Court of the District of Columbia on information by the Attorney General for the District of Columbia in the name of the District. The amount of any taxes that were not collected, truthfully accounted for, or paid over under a single scheme or systematic course of conduct in violation of this section may be aggregated in determining the grade of the offense and the sentence for the offense.

History

Oct. 4, 2000, D.C. Law 13-204, § 2(b), 47 DCR 5799
Apr. 13, 2005, D.C. Law 15-354, § 73(n)(2), 52 DCR 2638
June 11, 2013, D.C. Law 19-317, §§ 111(c)(2), 286(cc), 60 DCR 2064

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 15-354 substituted “Attorney General for the District of Columbia” for “Corporation Counsel”.
The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-317 in (a), substituted “twice” for “3 times” and substituted “not more than the amount set forth in [§ 22-3571.01]” for “not more than $10,000”; and substituted “not more than the amount set forth in [§ 22-3571.01]” for “not more than $5,000” in (b).

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see §§ 111(c)(2) and 286(cc) of the Criminal Fine Proportionality Emergency Amendment Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-45, April 1, 2013, 60 DCR 5400, 20 DCSTAT 1300).

Editor's Notes

Applicability of D.C. Law 19-317: Section 401 of D.C. Law 19-317 provided that the act shall apply only to offenses committed on or after June 11, 2013.